North Dakota, session 69, HB1201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
61-04-03.1. Limitation on amount of water.
An applicant may not apply for a permit or permits for irrigation which, if approved, would enable a
person, at any one time, to hold a conditional water permit or permits for more than seven hundred
twenty acre-feet [888106.75 cubic meters] of water from a single surface or ground water source that
has not been applied to beneficial use. Applications submitted in violation of this section may not be
assigned a priority date and must be returned to the applicant by the department of water resources.
This section may not apply to water permit applications from the Missouri River or to applications
submitted by irrigation districts organized pursuant to this title. For the purposes of this section,
"person", when applied to an individual, means the individual and the individual's spouse and
dependents within the meaning of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 152].

H. B. NO. 1201 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1201.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 0
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State